Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8431.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-18.9 of the General Laws entitled "Refuse Disposal" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-18.9-19. Siting restrictions for pyrolysis facilities.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) "Pyrolysis facility" means any facility or operation that thermally decomposes solid
waste, including plastics or other organic materials, in an oxygen-limited or oxygen-free
environment for the purpose of producing fuel, gas, oil, char, or other byproducts. The term shall
include any preprocessing, storage, or handling of feedstock or byproducts conducted as part of
such operation.
(2) "School" means any public or private elementary or secondary school, including charter
schools, approved by the Rhode Island department of education and serving students in any of
grades kindergarten through twelve (k-12).
(b) Prohibition.
Effective July 1, 2026, no person shall site, construct, install, expand, or operate a pyrolysis
facility within one mile of the property line of any school.
(c) Measurement.
The distance required under subsection (b) of this section shall be measured in a straight
line from the nearest property boundary of the proposed pyrolysis facility to the nearest property
boundary of the school.

(d) Permitting.
The Rhode Island department of environmental management shall not issue any permit,
license, or approval for a pyrolysis facility that does not comply with the requirements of this
section.
(e) Non-waiver.
The requirements of this section shall be mandatory and shall not be waived by the
department or any other state or municipal authority.
(f) Relationship to other laws.
The provisions of this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other applicable
requirements under this chapter or any other provision of the general laws or regulations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006290
========
LC006290 - Page 2 of 3